Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, HB2623.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Section 8-390, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended to read: START_STATUTE8-390. Notice of proceedings A. The court shall give notice to the prosecutor's office in a timely manner of any changes in scheduled proceedings. B. Except for detention hearings the court shall provide notice of all proceedings to the prosecutor's office at least five days before a scheduled proceeding. C. If the court finds that it is not reasonable to provide the five days' notice to the prosecutor's office pursuant to subsection B of this section, the court shall state in the record why it was not reasonable to provide five days' notice. D. On receiving the notice from the court, the prosecutor's office shall, on request, shall provide notice to the victim in a timely manner of scheduled proceedings,  and any changes in the schedule and that a predisposition or disposition proceeding may occur immediately following adjudication. END_STATUTE